Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,211.09
Continuous alcohol monitoring devices; Office of Probation Administration; duties.

The Office of Probation Administration shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to approve the use of continuous alcohol monitoring devices by individuals sentenced to probation for violating section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197.

Laws 2006, LB 925, § 17.